District of Columbia statutes.
48-203

Repealed

Prosecutions.

Repealed.

May 5, 1898, 30 Stat. 398, ch. 241, § 3
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(a), 49 DCR 1945
1981 Ed., § 33-203.
1973 Ed., § 33-203.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of §§ 48-201 to 48-203, see § 8(a) of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(a) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(a) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).